Arkansas statutes. Title 24 Retirement And Pensions
Chapter 1
General Provisions

Subchapter 1
— General Provisions

A.C.R.C. Notes.

References to “this subchapter” in §§ 24-1-101 — 24-1-105 may not apply to § 24-1-106 which was enacted subsequently.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1991, No. 343, § 12, provided:

“The Pension Review Board created under Arkansas Code § 24-1-103 is abolished.”

Former subchapter 1, concerning the Pension Review Board, was repealed by Acts 1991, No. 343, § 12. The subchapter was derived from the following sources:

24-1-101. Acts 1985, No. 359, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3312.

24-1-102. Acts 1985, No. 359, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3313.

24-1-103. Acts 1985, No. 359, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3314.

24-1-104. Acts 1985, No. 359, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-3315.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1995, No. 613, § 6: Mar. 14, 1995. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eightieth General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the fiscal soundness of the various state-supported retirement systems is vital to the operation of Arkansas state government; that the proper fiscal management of public retirement systems promotes the goal of good government and provides public employees with an incentive to perform efficiently and effectively; and that any delay in implementing a policy of sound fiscal management with regard to state-supported retirement systems could result in a financial disaster for any marginally financed retirement system in Arkansas. Therefore, in order to prevent a potential financial catastrophe, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and this act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 1999, No. 11, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System law does not recognize certain payments made by schools to teaching personnel as salary payments as defined under the retirement law, that allowing a broader definition of salary will help members achieve higher salaries for credit in the retirement system, that by increasing the benefits to members, more educators will be encouraged to stay in the teaching career fields, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the State's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 22, § 5: Feb. 4, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System currently provides members with noncontributory retirement service credit; that some members need to have contributory service credit to provide for an adequate retirement; and that providing for a change to contributory credited service will improve the motivation and effectiveness of the active teachers in Arkansas public schools. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 29, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that certain Teacher Retirement System retirants, for personal reasons which they do not wish disclosed, may want to suspend their benefits, that providing retirants with this option leaves the system open to question about liability for these suspended benefits and the law needs clarification in this situation, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 30, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that certain Teacher Retirement System retirants are sometimes needed by the Arkansas Department of Education to fulfill vital positions within the educational system of Arkansas, that current retirement law limits the amount of salaries which can be paid to System retirees and the law needs to provide a method by which the System can waive those earning limitations, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the State's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 81, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System provides members with the option to choose either a contributory or noncontributory membership, that keeping track of these options consumes a considerable amount of administrative time and effort, that the law needs to be simplified to reduce the cost and effort of keeping track of these options, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the State's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 110, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System law recognizes private school and out-of-state service for the purchase of credited service; that allowing the purchase of smaller increments of credited service will help members achieve more service credit for their teaching careers, that by increasing the benefit to members, more educators will be encouraged to stay in the teaching career fields; and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 221, § 6: Feb. 23, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that members of the Teacher Retirement System who receive the minimum benefits are some of the poorest retirees and are in the most need of having their benefits increased, and that the minimum benefits need adjusting based on the number of years of service to increase the equity of the benefit structure of the retirement system, and therefore this act should have effect immediately with the beginning of the State's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 311, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that, due to the ever escalating costs of health insurance and health care, benefits provided under the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 312, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that deceased members of the Teacher Retirement System leave families in need of financial support and that there is a necessity of financial stability for families during this time of crisis and the death benefit provisions should be increased, and that increasing the death benefit provisions of the retirement system can most effectively be managed at the beginning of the state's fiscal year and therefore this act should have effect immediately with the beginning of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 325, § 17: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that certain provisions of the law governing the Public Employees Retirement System need to be amended concerning eligibility, death benefits, and disability benefits, and that the effective administration of state government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 335, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that benefits provided under the Arkansas State Highway Employees' Retirement System are inadequate and that an increase should be provided as soon as practicable in order to avoid an undue hardship. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 387, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that historically the State Police Retirement System has recomputed retirement benefits on July 1 of each year to reflect a cost of living increase; that this act modifies the cost of living increase; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect of July 1 of this year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not be effective until July 1 of the succeeding year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 388, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that historically the Judicial Retirement System has recomputed retirement benefits on July 1 of each year to reflect a cost of living increase; that this act modifies the cost of living increase; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not go into effect on July 1 of this year; and that unless this emergency clause is adopted, this act will not be effective until July 1 of the succeeding year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 395, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that certain retirement annuity options continue for long periods of time, that providing these retirants with the capability of changing those options in the event of a death or divorce of the retirant or his beneficiaries will provide the needed flexibility in their financial conditions and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the state's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 400, § 6: Mar. 4, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that changes in the amount of monthly benefits in the Teacher Retirement System are necessary for the continued financial stability of the current retirees and that it is necessary to implement the changes in benefits at the beginning of the current fiscal year and therefore this act should have immediate effect. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 496, § 9: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that retirement benefits payable to current and future retirants and beneficiaries of the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System are inadequate; that the current and future retirant and beneficiary payments should be increased as soon as possible in order to relieve this inequity, and that the effective fiscal administration of the System will be aided by implementing those increases at the same time as the state's fiscal year begins. Therefore, in order to promote sound fiscal administration in State government, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 535, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that the exact percentage of the DROP contribution for the Arkansas Public Employees Retirement System should be specified in the law and for the effective administration of the System in this act must be effective at the beginning of the fiscal year because computations are made at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 555, § 17: Mar. 12, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the state needs to assure that the system is able to provide the best possible benefits, including safe, adequate, and affordable facilities, for the system's members and that several changes in, and clarification of, existing laws are immediately necessary in order for the system to continue to efficiently, effectively and timely administer the member's retirement benefits. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 864, § 6: Mar. 25, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System currently provides members with noncontributory retirement service credit; that some members need to have contributory service credit to provide for an adequate retirement; and that providing for a change to contributory credited service will improve the motivation and effectiveness of the active teachers in Arkansas public schools. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 866, § 12: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System law must be changed and refined periodically to clarify existing administrative practices within the system, that clarifying incorrect references and language in current law consumes a considerable amount of administrative time and effort, that the law needs to be clarified to reduce the cost and effort of responding to those inconsistencies, and that the most effective time to make changes to the retirement system is at the beginning of the State's fiscal year and therefore this act should take effect immediately at that time. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 870, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 311 of 1999 changes the amount of additional monthly benefits in the State Highway Employees' Retirement System and they are necessary for the continued financial stability of the current retirees, that clarifications are needed in order to make Act 311 take effect in an orderly fashion, that these changes in Act 311 must then take effect at the same time Act 311 becomes effective, and that it is necessary to implement the changes in benefits at the beginning of the current fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act, except for Sections 2 and 3, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 883, § 6: Mar. 29, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that members of the Arkansas Local Police and Fire Retirement System should be entitled to purchase credited service for military service; that this act corrects an inequity in the retirement system and should be given immediate effect. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 884, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that for the effective administration of this act, this act should become effective on July 1, 1999. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 907, § 8: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty Second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that the Teacher Retirement System provides members with the option to choose either a contributory or noncontributory membership, that Act 81 of 1999 will end this option and that some members need to have option restored to them, and that since Act 81 of 1999 will go into effect on July 1, 1999 then this act should be effective at the same time in order to avoid any statutory ambiguity. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 955, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that various Arkansas public retirement systems have reduced the amount of service credit needed for full retirement to twenty-eight (28) years of credited service, that retirement benefits are an important incentive to keep experienced policemen and firemen on the job and to reward them for their faithful service, that experienced policemen and firemen are a valuable human resource and should be encouraged to stay on the job by keeping their fringe benefits equal with those of other public employees, and that the beginning of the state's fiscal year is the best time to implement any change in retirement benefits. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 978, § 7: Mar. 31, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that Act 1241 of 1997 allowed the surviving spouses of police officers killed while in the official performance of his duties to continue to receive benefits if they remarried, that Act 1241 of 1997 became effective on August 1, 1997, and that surviving spouses of police officers killed while on duty prior to the effective date of Act 1241 lost retirement benefits upon any remarriage and should be able to benefit from this subsequent change in the law by making it retroactive. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1325, § 14: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that Act 311 of 1999 changes the amount of additional monthly benefits in the State Highway Employees' Retirement System and they are necessary for the continued financial stability of the current retirees, that clarifications are needed in order to make Act 311 take effect in an orderly fashion, that these changes in Act 311 must then take effect at the same time Act 311 becomes effective, and that it is necessary to implement the changes in benefits at the beginning of the current fiscal year. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act, except for Sections 2 and 3, being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1450, § 7: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that certain provisions of the law governing the Public Employees' Retirement System need to be amended concerning eligibility for death benefits and that the effective administration of state government makes it necessary for these changes to begin at the start of the state's fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1453, § 8: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that certain individuals were required to reimburse the Local Police and Fire Retirement System for Social Security disability payments which they received; that this has worked a financial hardship on individuals who are the least able to absorb the cost of the reimbursements, and that certain individuals who paid the Local Police and Fire Retirement System for Social Security disability benefits should have those benefit reimbursements restored as soon as possible. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1460, § 6: Apr. 15, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly, that for the effective administration of this act and to avoid undue harm to members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System it is necessary for this act to become effective immediately. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 1999, No. 1521, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that early retirement penalties for the Teacher Retirement System are overly harsh, that incentives for teachers to retire will improve staff morale and the working environment, and that the beginning of the fiscal year is the most advantageous time to implement benefit changes with the Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1587, § 6: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that for the effective administration of the system this act should become effective on July 1, 1999. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 1999, No. 1590, § 8: July 1, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the Teacher Retirement System has reduced the amount of service credit needed for full retirement to twenty-eight (28) years of credited service, that the Teacher Deferred Retirement Option Plan is an important incentive to keep experienced teachers in the classroom rather than retiring completely, that experienced teachers are a valuable human resource and should be encouraged to stay in the classroom, and that the beginning of the state's fiscal year is the best time to implement any change in retirement benefits. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on July 1, 1999.”

Acts 2011, No. 69, § 22: July 1, 2011. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that certain provisions of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System statutes are in urgent need of revision to bring them into conformance with sound public pension policy; that this revision is of great importance to members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System and to other citizens of the State of Arkansas; that a member's purchase of service credit currently provides that a member pay the system yesterday's dollars for the value of today's benefits; that such a valuation is unfair to the members as a whole and inconsistent with the prudent management of the system's funds and obligations; that the purchase of service credit in the system should be based upon actuarial equivalents; that the purchase of service credit should be paid in a lump sum to the system; that current service purchase accounts remain unpaid and inactive for many years at a time and create an administrative burden and accounting difficulty on the system that can be remedied by the passage of this act; and that this act is necessary in order to maintain an orderly system of benefits for the members of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2011.”

24-1-101. Assets and income for retirement systems.

All assets and income of any state-supported retirement system administered by an agency of the State of Arkansas shall be held, invested, or disbursed for the exclusive purpose of providing for benefits, investment management, and administrative expenses, including the acquisition of a building for the permanent offices of the state-supported retirement systems, and shall not be encumbered for or diverted to any other purposes.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 613, § 1.

24-1-102. Annual valuation.

Annually, each Arkansas state-supported retirement system shall make a valuation of each system's assets and incomes for the system.

Actuarial assumptions and methods which are used for the annual valuation of each Arkansas state-supported retirement system shall be set by each system's board based upon the recommendations made by the board's actuary and agreed upon by the actuary employed by the Joint Committee on Public Retirement and Social Security Programs or other actuary employed by the General Assembly to review public retirement system legislation.

If the board's actuary and the actuary employed by the General Assembly do not agree as to the actuarial assumptions and methods used to calculate the system's valuation, then a third actuary shall be selected mutually between the actuaries, and the third actuary shall determine the actuarial assumptions and methods to be used.

The actuarial assumptions and methods shall include the actuarial funding method, the method of valuing assets, and similar actuarial matters involved in the actuarial valuation.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 613, § 2.

24-1-103. Change of contribution rate.

No contribution rate of any state-supported retirement system in effect on March 14, 1995, shall be changed except by a vote of the General Assembly.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 613, § 2.

24-1-104. Liabilities not to exceed thirty-year amortization.

No legislated benefit enhancement shall be enacted which would cause the system's unfunded accrued actuarial liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 613, § 2.

24-1-105. Liabilities exceeding thirty-year amortization period — Legislated benefit enhancement prohibited.

When any retirement system on or after March 14, 1995, has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years, that system shall not have a legislated benefit enhancement until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards set by this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 613, § 2.

24-1-106. Benefit enhancements.

No benefit enhancement provided for by §§ 24-2-302, 24-2-306, 24-2-401, 24-2-402, 24-2-501, 24-3-102 [repealed], 24-3-106 [repealed], 24-3-201 [repealed], 24-3-208 [repealed], 24-3-209 [repealed], 24-3-301 [repealed], 24-3-303 [repealed], 24-3-304 [repealed], 24-4-101, 24-4-106, 24-4-107, 24-4-301, 24-4-507, 24-4-508, 24-4-510, 24-4-511, 24-4-518 — 24-4-520, 24-4-601, 24-4-608, 24-4-618, 24-4-710 [repealed], 24-4-745 — 24-4-747, 24-4-801, 24-4-803, 24-5-112, 24-5-119, 24-5-125, 24-5-133, 24-5-204, 24-6-219, 24-6-403 — 24-6-406, 24-6-410, 24-6-411, 24-7-202, 24-7-209, 24-7-301, 24-7-406, 24-7-504 [repealed], 24-7-603, 24-7-604, 24-7-606, 24-7-607, 24-7-702, 24-7-705, 24-7-706, and 24-7-708, § 24-7-713(b), §§ 24-7-720, 24-7-727, 24-7-728, 24-7-729, 24-7-1314 [repealed], 24-7-1315, 24-7-1401 — 24-7-1409 [repealed], 24-8-223, 24-8-226 — 24-8-228, 24-8-701 — 24-8-714, 24-8-715 [repealed], 24-8-716, 24-8-717, 24-10-102, 24-10-303, 24-10-504 — 24-10-509, 24-10-602, 24-10-611, 24-10-613, 24-11-425, 24-11-434, 24-11-437, 24-11-438, 24-11-805, 24-11-818, and 24-11-833 shall be implemented if it would cause the publicly supported retirement system's unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities to exceed a thirty-year amortization.

No benefit enhancement provided for by §§ 24-2-302, 24-2-306, 24-2-401, 24-2-402, 24-2-501, 24-3-102 [repealed], 24-3-106 [repealed], 24-3-201 [repealed], 24-3-208 [repealed], 24-3-209 [repealed], 24-3-301 [repealed], 24-3-303 [repealed], 24-3-304 [repealed], 24-4-101, 24-4-106, 24-4-107, 24-4-301, 24-4-507, 24-4-508, 24-4-510, 24-4-511, 24-4-518 — 24-4-520, 24-4-601, 24-4-608, 24-4-618, 24-4-710 [repealed], 24-4-745 — 24-4-747, 24-4-801, 24-4-803, 24-5-112, 24-5-119, 24-5-125, 24-5-133, 24-5-204, 24-6-219, 24-6-403 — 24-6-406, 24-6-410, 24-6-411, 24-7-202, 24-7-209, 24-7-301, 24-7-406, 24-7-504 [repealed], 24-7-603, 24-7-604, 24-7-606, 24-7-607, 24-7-702, 24-7-705, 24-7-706, and 24-7-708, § 24-7-713(b), §§ 24-7-720, 24-7-727, 24-7-728, 24-7-729, 24-7-1314 [repealed], 24-7-1315, 24-7-1401 — 24-7-1409 [repealed], 24-8-223, 24-8-226 — 24-8-228, 24-8-701 — 24-8-714, 24-8-715 [repealed], 24-8-716, 24-8-717, 24-10-102, 24-10-303, 24-10-504 — 24-10-509, 24-10-602, 24-10-611, 24-10-613, 24-11-425, 24-11-434, 24-11-437, 24-11-438, 24-11-805, 24-11-818, and 24-11-833 shall be implemented by any publicly supported system which has unfunded actuarial accrued liabilities being amortized over a period exceeding thirty (30) years until the unfunded actuarial accrued liability is reduced to a level less than the standards prescribed by Title 24 of this Code.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 11, § 3; 1999, No. 29, § 2; 1999, No. 30, § 2; 1999, No. 81, § 3; 1999, No. 104, § 3; 1999, No. 110, § 3; 1999, No. 221, § 2; 1999, No. 311, § 2; 1999, No. 312, § 2; 1999, No. 325, § 13; 1999, No. 335, § 2; 1999, No. 387, § 8; 1999, No. 388, § 2; 1999, No. 395, § 3; 1999, No. 396, § 4; 1999, No. 399, § 5; 1999, No. 400, § 2; 1999, No. 404, § 2; 1999, No. 496, § 5; 1999, No. 535, § 2; 1999, No. 537, § 7; 1999, No. 555, § 13; 1999, No. 627, § 4; 1999, No. 705, § 2; 1999, No. 706, § 2; 1999, No. 710, § 2; 1999, No. 715, § 2; 1999, No. 716, § 3; 1999, No. 863, § 2; 1999, No. 864, § 2; 1999, No. 865, § 7; 1999, No. 866, § 8; 1999, No. 868, § 4; 1999, No. 869, § 2; 1999, No. 870, § 2; 1999, No. 883, § 2; 1999, No. 884, § 2; 1999, No. 901, § 3; 1999, No. 903, § 2; 1999, No. 907, § 3; 1999, No. 955, § 2; 1999, No. 978, § 3; 1999, No. 1010, § 3; 1999, No. 1067, § 5; 1999, No. 1070, § 6; 1999, No. 1171, § 3; 1999, No. 1325, § 9; 1999, No. 1450, § 3; 1999, No. 1453, § 4; 1999, No. 1455, § 2; 1999, No. 1458, § 3; 1999, No. 1459, § 2; 1999, No. 1460, § 2; 1999, No. 1521, § 2; 1999, No. 1587, § 2; 1999, No. 1590, § 4; 2003, No. 347, § 2.

24-1-107. Recognition of federal retirement programs.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall establish policies and promulgate rules to recognize the service credit for members of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System earned in the retirement systems of federal government agencies.

A former federal employee who becomes a member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall receive service credit for the member's service with the federal retirement system as prescribed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

An active member of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System shall receive credit for the member's federal service upon the payment of the employee and employer contributions prescribed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System together with interest from the date the federal service began to the date of payment.

An active member of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall receive credit for the member's federal service upon the payment of the cost of service under § 24-7-502(b) and as prescribed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall determine what constitutes a year of federal service credit.

The member may qualify for age and service retirement in the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System or the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System using the federal credited service plus the member's credited service from employment from the state employers to meet the minimum service requirements of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System.

The Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System shall promulgate rules necessary for the effective administration of this section.

The member shall certify in a manner prescribed by the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System and the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System that the member is not eligible to receive a retirement benefit from the federal retirement system in which he or she had previously been a member.

History.

Acts 2005, No. 2091, § 1; 2011, No. 69, § 1.

Amendments.

The 2011 amendment added (b)(1)(B); and, in (b)(1)(A), deleted “or the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” preceding “shall receive credit” and deleted “and the Board of Trustees of the Arkansas Teacher Retirement System” preceding “together with interest”.